de: Zugangsmechanismus: Schräge Leiter; Kletterwand; Rutsche; Treppe mit Stauraum; Treppe ohne Stauraum; Gerade Leiter; Andere
nl: Toegangsmechanisme: Schuine ladder; Klimmuur; Glijbaan; Trap met opbergruimte; Trap zonder opbergruimte; Rechte ladder; Overig
ro-RO: Mecanismul de acces: Scară înclinată; Perete de cățărat; Tobogan; Trepte cu spațiu de depozitare; Trepte fără spațiu de depozitare; Scară dreaptă; Altele
fi: Kulkumekanismi: Viistot tikkaat; Kiipeilyseinä; Liukumäki; Portaat säilytystilalla; Portaat ilman säilytystilaa; Suorat tikkaat; Muu
es: Mecanismo de acceso: Escalera inclinada; Muro de escalada; Tobogán; Escaleras con almacenamiento; Escaleras sin almacenamiento; Escalera recta; Otro
pt-PT: Mecanismo de acesso: Escada inclinada; Parede de escalada; Escorrega; Escadas com arrumação; Escadas sem arrumação; Escada reta; Outro
zh-CN: 上床机制: 斜梯; 攀岩墙; 滑梯; 带储物空间的楼梯; 无储物空间的楼梯; 直梯; 其他
hu: Hozzáférési mechanizmus: Döntött létra; Mászófal; Csúszda; Tárolós lépcső; Tároló nélküli lépcső; Egyenes létra; Egyéb
lt-LT: Prieigos mechanizmas: Pasviros kopėčios; Laipiojimo siena; Čiuožykla; Laiptai su daiktadėžėmis; Laiptai be daiktadėžių; Tiesios kopėčios; Kita
pt-BR: Mecanismo de acesso: Escada inclinada; Parede de escalada; Escorregador; Escadas com armazenamento; Escadas sem armazenamento; Escada reta; Outros
hr-HR: Mehanizam pristupa: Kose ljestve; Zid za penjanje; Tobogan; Stepenice sa spremištem; Stepenice bez spremišta; Ravne ljestve; Ostalo
it: Meccanismo di accesso: Scala inclinata; Parete da arrampicata; Scivolo; Scale con scomparti; Scale senza scomparti; Scala dritta; Altro
sv: Åtkomstmekanism: Vinklad stege; Klättervägg; Rutschkana; Trappa med förvaring; Trappa utan förvaring; Rak stege; Övrigt
ko: 접근 메커니즘: 사선형 사다리; 클라이밍 월; 미끄럼틀; 수납형 계단; 수납 없는 계단; 수직형 사다리; 기타
en: Access mechanism: Angled ladder; Climbing wall; Slide; Stairs with storage; Stairs without storage; Straight ladder; Other
cs: Přístupový mechanismus: Šikmý žebřík; Lezecká stěna; Skluzavka; Schody s úložným prostorem; Schody bez úložného prostoru; Rovný žebřík; Ostatní
ru: Механизм доступа: Наклонная лестница; Скалодром; Горка; Ступеньки с местом для хранения; Ступеньки без места для хранения; Прямая лестница; Другое
bg-BG: Механизъм за достъп: Наклонена стълба; Стена за катерене; Пързалка; Стълби с място за съхранение; Стълби без място за съхранение; Права стълба; Други
sl-SI: Mehanizem dostopa: Nagnjena lestev; Plezalna stena; Tobogan; Stopnice s prostorom za shranjevanje; Stopnice brez prostora za shranjevanje; Ravna lestev; Drugo
da: Adgangsmekanisme: Vinklet stige; Klatrevæg; Rutsjebane; Trappe med opbevaring; Trappe uden opbevaring; Lige stige; Anden
ja: アクセスメカニズム: 傾斜はしご; クライミングウォール; すべり台; 収納付き階段; 収納なし階段; 垂直はしご; その他
sk-SK: Prístupový mechanizmus: Šikmý rebrík; Lezecká stena; Šmykľavka; Schody s úložným priestorom; Schody bez úložného priestoru; Rovný rebrík; Iné
vi: Cơ chế tiếp cận: Thang nghiêng; Vách leo núi; Cầu trượt; Cầu thang có hộc chứa đồ; Cầu thang không có hộc chứa đồ; Thang thẳng; Khác
tr: Erişim mekanizması: Açılı merdiven; Tırmanma duvarı; Kaydırak; Depolama alanlı basamaklar; Depolama alansız basamaklar; Düz merdiven; Diğer
zh-TW: 存取機制: 斜梯; 攀岩牆; 溜滑梯; 附收納空間階梯; 無收納空間階梯; 直梯; 其他
th: วิธีการขึ้นเตียงยกสูง: บันไดเอียง; หน้าผาจำลอง; สไลเดอร์; บันไดพร้อมที่เก็บของ; บันไดไม่มีที่เก็บของ; บันไดตรง; อื่นๆ
el: Μηχανισμός πρόσβασης: Σκάλα με κλίση; Τοίχος αναρρίχησης; Τσουλήθρα; Σκαλιά με αποθηκευτικό χώρο; Σκαλιά χωρίς αποθηκευτικό χώρο; Κάθετη σκάλα; Άλλο
pl: Sposób dostępu: Drabina pochyła; Ścianka wspinaczkowa; Zjeżdżalnia; Schody ze schowkiem; Schody bez schowka; Drabina prosta; Inne
nb: Tilgangsmekanisme: Skrå stige; Klatrevegg; Sklie; Trapp med oppbevaring; Trapp uten oppbevaring; Rett stige; Annet
fr: Mécanisme d’accès: Échelle inclinée; Mur d’escalade; Toboggan; Escaliers avec rangement; Escaliers sans rangement; Échelle droite; Autre